District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
21 act may be cited as the "RFK Campus Small Area Plan Amendment Act of 2026".
22 Sec. 2. Section 4(c) of the District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan Act of 1984 Land
23 Use Element Amendment Act of 1984, effective March 16, 1985 (D.C. Law 5-187; D.C. Official
24 Code§ 1-306.03(c)), is amended by adding a new paragraph (6) to read as follows:
25 "(6) The Mayor may include in a proposed small area plan covering the RFK
26 Campus, as defined in section 2(18) of the Robert F. Kennedy Campus Redevelopment
27 Amendment Act of 2025, effective November 21, 2025 (D.C. Law 26-54; D.C. Official Code§
28 10-1605.01(18)), proposed amendments to the Future Land Use Map for the area covered by the
29 small area plan and conforming amendments to the text of the Comprehensive Plan. Such
30 proposed amendments, if included in the proposed small area plan, shall not be subject to the
31 requirements of section 8( d) and ( e) of the District of Columbia Comprehensive Plan Act of
32 1984, effective May 23, 1990 (D.C. Law 8-129; D.C. Official Code§ 1-306.04(d) and (e));
33 provided, that the Mayor shall separately submit any such proposed amendments to the Council

34 for its consideration as proposed amendments to the Comprehensive Plan.”.
35 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
36 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
37 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
38 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
39 Sec. 4. Effective date.
40 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
41 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
42 provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
43 December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the
44 District of Columbia Register.
2

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: February 25, 2026
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – RFK Campus Small Area Plan Amendment
Act of 2026
REFERENCE: Draft bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on February 25,
2026
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill.
Background
Under current law, the Mayor must follow a process1 to consider proposed amendments to the
District’s Comprehensive Plan2, including providing environmental assessments of the amendment,
and a mechanism for public meetings and review.
The bill will allow the Mayor to propose amendments to the Future Land Use Maps3 for the mixed-
use portion of the RFK Campus4 development without following the full processes. However,
proposed amendments still must be submitted to Council for consideration. The stadium portion of
the development is already exempted5 from zoning requirements and is not affected by the bill.
1 D.C. Official Code § 1-306.04(d) and (e).
2 D.C. Official Code §§ 1-306.01, et al.
3 https://planning.dc.gov/page/comprehensive-plan-future-land-use-maps
4 D.C. Official Code § 10–1605.01.
5 D.C. Official Code § 1–306.07.
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “RFK Campus Small Area Plan Amendment Act of 2026,” Draft bill provided to the Office of Revenue
Analysis on February 25, 2026
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year 2029 budget and financial plan to
implement the bill. Exempting amendment procedures for amendments to the Future Land Use Map
of a portion of the RFK Campus development does not have a fiscal impact.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
Legal Counsel Division
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: March 5, 2026
RE: RFK Campus Small Area Plan Amendment Act 2026
(AE-26-507)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
legislation entitled the “RFK Campus Small Area Plan Amendment Act 2026” and determined that
it is legally sufficient. If you have any questions, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Suite 409, Washington, D.C. 20004
Phone (202) 262-6402 Email: adele.el-khouri@dc.gov